Illinois, session 104th, HB4791.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Smart Start Illinois Act is amended by 5changing Section 95-10 as follows: 6    (325 ILCS 85/95-10)7    Sec. 95-10. Smart Start Child Care Workforce Compensation 8Program. 9    (a) The Department of Human Services shall create and 10establish the Smart Start Child Care Workforce Compensation 11Program. The purpose of the Smart Start Child Care Workforce 12Compensation Program is to invest in early childhood education 13and care service providers, including, but not limited to, 14providers participating in the Child Care Assistance Program 15or in a Head Start or Early Head Start Program; to expand the 16supply of high-quality early childhood education and care; and 17to create a strong and stable early childhood education and 18care system with attractive wages, high-quality services, and 19affordable costs.20    (b) The purpose of the Smart Start Child Care Workforce 21Compensation Program is to stabilize community-based early 22childhood education and care service providers, raise the 23wages of early childhood educators, and support quality   HB4791 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 18416 KTG 31858 b1enhancements that can position service providers to 2participate in other public funding streams, such as Preschool 3for All, in order to further enhance and expand quality 4service delivery. 5    (c) Subject to appropriation, the Department of Human 6Services shall implement the Smart Start Child Care Workforce 7Compensation Program for eligible licensed day care centers, 8licensed day care homes, and licensed group day care homes by 9October 1, 2024, or as soon as practicable, following 10completion of a planning and transition year. As By October 1, 112025, or as soon as practicable, and for each year thereafter, 12subject to appropriation, the Department of Human Services 13shall continue to operate the Smart Start Child Care Workforce 14Compensation Program annually with all licensed day care 15centers, licensed day care homes, and licensed group day care 16homes that meet eligibility requirements. Head Start programs 17and Early Head Start programs may be deemed eligible to 18participate in the Smart Start Child Care Workforce 19Compensation Program to the extent that appropriations are 20made available for new program entrants and shall not result 21in the reduction, reallocation, or displacement of funding for 22existing recipients. The Smart Start Child Care Workforce 23Compensation Program shall operate separately from and shall 24not supplant the Child Care Assistance Program as provided for 25in Section 9A-11 of the Illinois Public Aid Code.26    (d) The Department of Human Services shall adopt   HB4791 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 18416 KTG 31858 b1administrative rules by October 1, 2024 to facilitate 2administration of the Smart Start Child Care Workforce 3Compensation Program, including, but not limited to, 4provisions for program eligibility, the application and 5funding calculation process, eligible expenses, required wage 6floors, and requirements for financial and personnel reporting 7and monitoring requirements. Eligibility and funding 8provisions shall be based on appropriation and a current model 9of the cost to provide child care services by a licensed child 10care center or licensed family child care home.11    (e) Participation in multiple funding streams. A provider 12participating in the Smart Start Child Care Workforce 13Compensation Program may simultaneously receive funding 14through Head Start or Early Head Start programs. Receipt of 15funding under one program shall not disqualify or otherwise 16limit eligibility for funding under the other, provided that:17        (1) funds are used in accordance with the requirements 18    of each respective program; and19        (2) funds are not used to supplant existing federal 20    Head Start or Early Head Start funding, but may be used to 21    supplement and enhance workforce compensation and program 22    quality. 23(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.)